Louisiana, session 2026, HB353.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 6-B of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:671 through 674, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 6-B. MINIMUM WAGE
§671. Minimum wage; establishment
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the state
minimum wage is established and set as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the minimum wage shall be set at twelve
dollars per hour. Every employer in the state shall pay to each employee wages at
a rate of not less than twelve dollars per hour for hours worked in a pay period,
regardless of how the time at work is measured.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, the minimum wage shall be set at fifteen
dollars per hour. Every employer in the state shall pay to each employee wages at
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-733 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 353
a rate of not less than fifteen dollars per hour for hours worked in a pay period,
regardless of how the time at work is measured.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2031, and annually thereafter, the minimum wage
shall be set in proportion to the annual average increase, if any, in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers in the South region published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the previous calendar
year. Any increase made pursuant to this Paragraph shall be adjusted to the nearest
multiple of five cents.
B. If, at any time, the federal minimum hourly wage rate set by Section 6 of
the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, or a successor federal law, is raised to
a rate higher than the state minimum wage rate, then the state minimum wage rate
shall be increased to the rate of the federal minimum wage rate.
§672. Penalties
A. Whoever violates the provisions of this Chapter shall be fined not less
than five hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars per employee not
receiving minimum wage. Additionally, the employer shall pay the employee the
difference between the wages actually paid to the employee and the minimum wage
rate in effect at the time the employee was paid.
B. Penalties may be imposed by a ruling of the secretary pursuant to an
adjudicatory hearing held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S.
49:950 et seq.
§673. Exceptions
The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to student employees of the state
or student employees of state colleges and universities.
§674. Enforcement
Louisiana Works shall enforce this Chapter and may promulgate rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et
seq., necessary for the implementation of the provisions of this Chapter.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-733 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 353